Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 80

Earthquake Resistant Design for Public Structures

Cross References. Earthquake activity, §15-21-601 et seq.

Earthquake Preparedness Act, §12-77-101 et seq.

Effective Dates. Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 22 and 23, § 2: May 23, 2016. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that seismic design requirements found in the Arkansas Fire Prevention Code are overly restrictive; that the nature of these restrictions require businesses to expend significant resources; and that this act is immediately necessary to correct this restriction, to ease the burden on businesses considering construction in Arkansas, and to promote local economic development efforts. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

12-80-101. Purpose.

It is the purpose of this chapter to protect the public by requiring that all public structures be designed and constructed to resist destructive forces when an earthquake occurs in the New Madrid Seismic Zone.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1100, § 1.

12-80-102. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Add to” means adding to the original existing buildings or structures more than four thousand square feet (4,000 sq. ft.) in gross floor area and all areas of increased building height;

“Alter”, “retrofit”, and “remodel” mean any alteration or repair of a building which when completed will increase the market value of the building by one hundred percent (100%) or more;

“Owner” means any agency of the state, county, city, township, town, village, or private entity, partnership, business, or corporation;

“Public structure” means any building intended, or adaptable, for public employment, assembly, or any other use if it will be open to the public.

Also included in this definition are certain building types as defined under the term “public works” projects;

“Public works” means works, whether of construction or adaptation, undertaken and carried out by the national, state, county, school district, or municipal authorities, and designed to serve some purpose of public necessity, use, or convenience such as public buildings, roads, aqueducts, parks, and all other fixed works constructed for public use.

The term relates to the construction of public improvements and not to their maintenance or operation;

“Seal” means the Arkansas seal issued to signify certification of registration to practice architecture or engineering;

“Seismic” means pertaining to an earthquake or earth tremor, i.e., vibrations; and

“Structural elements” means all structural load-carrying members of a building or structure required to transmit loads, i.e., forces within the building or between the building and the ground.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment inserted “the original” in (1); and made stylistic changes.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1100, § 2; 1999, No. 1485, § 1.

12-80-103. Seismic zones established.

Areas within the boundaries of this state shall be divided into zones of anticipated damage that will occur in various locations with respect to the New Madrid Seismic Zone.

This division will be based on the Arkansas Fire Prevention Code.

Zone 3, the area of greatest anticipated seismic damage, shall include the following counties: Clay, Greene, Craighead, Mississippi, Poinsett, Cross, Crittenden, St. Francis, Randolph, Lawrence, Jackson, Woodruff, and Lee.

Zone 2, the area of moderate anticipated seismic damage, shall include the following counties: Sharp, Independence, White, Lonoke, Prairie, Arkansas, Monroe, Phillips, Fulton, Izard, Stone, and Cleburne.

Zone 1, the area of low anticipated seismic damage, shall include all remaining counties within the boundaries of this state.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment rewrote this section.

Buildings or other structures classified as Category I or Category II occupancies as described in Table 1604.5, Arkansas Fire Prevention Code, Volume II, 2012 Edition, or in American Society of Civil Engineers Standard 7-10, Table 1.5-1, that are constructed for manufacturing or industrial occupancy or for public works may be designed using the mapped ground motion response accelerations for a ten-percent probability of exceeding the design seismic event in a fifty-year period based on United States Geological Survey data, instead of the mapped ground motion response accelerations for a two-percent or other probability of exceeding the design seismic event in a fifty-year period as set out in the Arkansas Fire Prevention Code, 2012 Edition, or subsequent editions of the Arkansas Fire Prevention Code if the alternate design standard has been properly adopted by ordinance in the locality in which the building or other structure is to be constructed.

Under subdivision (a)(2)(B)(i) of this section, SDS shall equal SMS and SD1 shall equal SM1 in lieu of the two-thirds adjustment indicated in Equation 16-39 and Equation 16-40 of the Arkansas Fire Prevention Code, Volume II, 2012 Edition, and the design seismic base shear V in any given direction shall be not less than that determined in accordance with Section 1607, Standard Building Code, 1997 Edition.

As used in subdivision (a)(2)(B)(ii) of this section, “SDS”, “SMS”, “SD1”, and “SM1” mean the same as defined in the Arkansas Fire Prevention Code, Volume II, 2012 Edition.

(1)All construction plans for public buildings and structures shall comply with the Arkansas Architectural Act, § 17-15-101 et seq.

Educational and institutional structures in Seismic Hazard Exposure Group III shall have nonstructural interior components, such as bookshelves, light fixtures, shelving, hot water tanks, oxygen tanks, etc., to meet earthquake resistant guidelines.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment rewrote (a)(2); added (b)(4); and made stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendment substituted “as defined in §17-30-101” for “registered in the State of Arkansas” in (b)(2).

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 22 and 23 added (a)(2)(B).

Agricultural structures; and

The following wood frame, metal, or both, construction business occupancies of four thousand square feet (4,000 sq. ft.) or less:

Business occupancy of less than forty (40);

Mercantile occupancy with a load less than one hundred (100); and

Storage.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment rewrote (a); deleted former (c); and made stylistic changes.

(1)The park and recreational facilities of the State of Arkansas, any of its agencies or departments, or any city, town, or county government or any school district shall not be included in the requirements of this chapter.

Any owner knowingly constructing a public building within this state without complying with the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a violation and shall upon conviction be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

Each day of the unlawful construction practice shall constitute a distinct and separate offense.

A.C.R.C. Notes. As enacted by Acts 1991, No. 1100, § 6, subsection (a) between “state” and “without” read:

“after September 1, 1991,”.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1100, § 3; 1999, No. 1485, § 2; 2005, No. 1290, § 1.

12-80-104. Design requirements.

(1)Neither the state or any county, city, township, village, or private entity shall construct, add to, alter, retrofit, or remodel any public structure unless the structural elements are designed to resist the anticipated forces of the designated seismic zone in which the structure is located.

(A)Design loads and seismic design requirements shall be, as a minimum, those listed in the Chapter of Structure Loads and referenced chapters from the Arkansas Fire Prevention Code.

The design of structural elements of public buildings and structures shall be performed by a professional engineer as defined in §17-30-101 who is competent in seismic structural design according to current standards of technical competence.

The structural plans of each public building or structure shall bear the engineer's Arkansas seal and signature and a statement of reference to what seismic zone the structure is designed to satisfy.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1100, § 4; 1999, No. 1485, § 3; 2011, No. 897, § 10; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 22, § 1; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 23, § 1.

12-80-105. Exemptions.

Certain building types shall not be included in the requirements of this chapter, such as:

Single family residential;

Duplexes;

Triplexes;

Fourplexes;

As used in this subsection, “park and recreational facilities” shall mean any facilities which are generally open structures and have three (3) or fewer sides and are used for athletics, recreation, relaxation, entertainment, cultural development, and other recreational activities, including, without limitation, park pavilions, amphitheaters, covered stage areas, camping centers, tennis courts, golf course shelters, athletic fields, baseball fields and dugouts, and various other similar park and recreational facilities.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1100, § 5; 1995, No. 520, § 1; 1997, No. 1228, § 1; 1999, No. 1485, § 4.

12-80-106. Violations and penalties.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1100, § 6; 2005, No. 1994, § 79.

12-80-107. Exemptions for roads and bridges.

None of the highway, road, street, or bridge facilities in this state shall be included in the requirements of this chapter.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 569, § 1.